Utah statutes.
10-2-612.   New municipality -- Ownership of property -- Indebtedness of original municipalities.

Any consolidated municipality shall be deemed to be a continuation of the merged municipalities, except as herein expressly provided, and shall own all of the assets, property, records, seals, equipment, and be responsible for the liabilities of each and all of the municipalities dissolved by the consolidation. The new municipality shall require the inhabitants of an original municipality included in the consolidation, by special tax levy, to satisfy any indebtedness incurred by the original municipalities provided inhabitants residing in other parts of the consolidated municipality did not or do not benefit by the revenue or services obtained by the expenditures causing the indebtedness. The governing body of the consolidated municipality shall be subject to the terms of the consolidation plan.

